Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1284YH (3) 91 ll/js H.F. 193 Section 1. Section 331.604, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. Except as otherwise provided by state law, subsection 3 4 , or section 331.605 , the recorder shall collect a fee of 4 five ten dollars for each page or fraction of a page of an 5 instrument which that is filed or recorded in the recorderâs 6 office. If a page or fraction of a page contains more than 7 one transaction, the recorder shall collect the fee for each 8 transaction. 9 Sec. 2. Section 331.604, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 10 by striking the subsection. 11 Sec. 3. Section 331.604, subsection 3, paragraphs b, c, and 12 d, Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs. 13 Sec. 4. Section 331.606B, subsection 7, paragraph a, Code 14 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 15 Sec. 5. TRANSITION. Any moneys remaining in a countyâs 16 county recorderâs records management fund as of the effective 17 date of this Act shall be used by the county recorder for the 18 purposes outlined in section 331.602. On the effective date of 19 this Act, the county treasurer of each county shall transfer 20 any unencumbered and unobligated moneys in the countyâs 21 county recorderâs electronic transaction fund to the treasurer 22 of state for deposit in the local government electronic 23 transaction fund created in section 331.604, Code 2025. Any 24 moneys remaining in the local government electronic transaction 25 fund after the effective date of this Act are appropriated 26 to the treasurer of state for the payment of claims approved 27 by the governing board of the county land record information 28 system pursuant to section 331.604, Code 2025. 29